District of Columbia statutes.
38-401.02

Public liability insurance.

The Board of Education may by regulation require persons and organizations, other than District of Columbia and federal agencies, holding use agreements or lease agreements with the Board of Education to carry public liability insurance including protection of the interests of the District of Columbia and its officers, employees, and agents, and the Board of Education and its members, officers, employees, and agents, with respect to claims for personal injuries and other damages allegedly occurring at properties where these leases or use agreements exist.

History

Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-158, § 4, 29 DCR 3632

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-401 and § 38-401.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-201.2.